Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.038

Physical therapist assistants—Waiver of examination.

The board shall waive the examination and grant a license to a person who meets the commonly accepted standards for practicing as a physical therapist assistant, as adopted by rule. Persons eligible for licensure as a physical therapist assistant under this section must apply for a license within one year of July 1, 2008.

[ 2007 c 98 s 7.]